Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-4,106
Nonresident fish dealer's permit; issuance; fee.

Nonresidents holding a valid nonresident fish dealer's permit may possess, buy, sell, transport, and ship live baitfish, live fish, and other bait species as specified in commission rules and regulations legally obtained from outside this state or from a licensed aquaculture facility in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. The application for the permit shall include the applicant's social security number. The fee for a nonresident fish dealer's permit shall be not more than seventy-five dollars, as established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 216;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 26;

Laws 2003, LB 306, § 17;

Laws 2008, LB1162, § 17.